Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-179.04
Enrollment, defined.

Enrollment means the registration of livestock identified by nonvisual identifier means of livestock identification approved by the Nebraska Brand Committee and which occurs electronically and uses only those approved identifiers for evidence of ownership.

Laws 2021, LB572, § 7.